Tennessee, session 114, SB0103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (58).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-250(a), is amended by adding
the following language as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee wars commission, created by § 4-11-301;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0103
000362
- 1 -